Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-408
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 42-402 to 42-407 shall be construed to constitute a legal separation of a prior legal marriage according to the laws of this state wherein a license was secured and a ceremony performed by some person empowered by law to perform such marriage ceremony of any Indian of whole or mixed blood residing in the state.

Laws 1913, c. 68, § 8, p. 203;

R.S.1913, § 1614;

C.S.1922, § 1563;

C.S.1929, § 42-408;

R.S.1943, § 42-408;

Laws 1999, LB 8, § 2.